District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.44

Independence established and recognized.

(a)

The Council of the District of Columbia (“Council”) administratively establishes itself, as authorized in subchapter IV of Chapter 2 of this title, as an independent and coordinate branch of the District of Columbia government.

(b)

The Council recognizes the principle of separation of powers in the structure of the District of Columbia government.

(c)

The Council shall, following receipt of the report of the study committee established by § 3, adopt such acts and resolutions to implement the organizational and administrative independence of the Council.

July 24, 1982, D.C. Law 4-127, § 2, 29 DCR 2396
1981 Ed., § 1-227.1.
“Section 3”, referred to in subsection (c) of this section, is § 3 of D.C. Law 4-127.
Study committee established: Section 3 of D.C. Law 4-127 provided for the establishment of a 5-member study committee to study the organizational and administrative independence of the Council as a coordinate branch of the District of Columbia government. Section 4 of D.C. Law 4-127 outlined the responsibilities of the study committee.